Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.570

Early intervention services—Findings.

The legislature finds that there is an urgent and substantial need to:

(1) Enhance the development of infants and toddlers with disabilities in the state of Washington in order to minimize developmental delay and maximize individual potential and enhance the capability of families to meet the needs of their infants and toddlers with disabilities and maintain family integrity;

(2) Coordinate and enhance the state's existing early intervention services to ensure a statewide, community-based, coordinated, interagency program of early intervention services for infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families; and

(3) Facilitate the coordination of payment for early intervention services from federal, state, local, and private sources including public and private insurance coverage.

[ 1992 c 198 s 14. Formerly RCW 43.215.470, 70.195.005.]